Maryland, session 2025, HB0825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
12–201.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Small Business Retirement Savings Board.
(b) The Board consists of the following members:
(1) the State Treasurer, or the State Treasurer’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee; [and]
(3) THE COMPTROLLER, OR THE COMPTROLLER’S DESIGNEE; AND
[(3)] (4) nine members with expertise in retirement programs and
benefits, investments, financial systems and controls, or small business, appointed as
follows:
(i) three members, appointed by the Governor;
– 1 –

Ch. 291 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) three members, appointed by the President of the Senate; and
(iii) three members, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Delegates.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –